Arkansas, session 2025, HB1099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the State Board of Election Commissioners for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N131N SBEC DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS12
(2) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(3) G314C ELECTION ADMIN SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS11
(4) G073C ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS10
(5) A116C BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(6) G119C SBEC EDUCATIONAL SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
*CJW001*
01/06/2025 1:55:30 PM CJW001

HB1099
(7) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(8) G162C SBEC ELECTION COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 9

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the State Board
of Election Commissioners for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: twenty (20)
temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed
those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the State Board of Election Commissioners, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the State Board of Election Commissioners for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $603,967
(02) EXTRA HELP 100,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 221,840
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 167,810
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,000
(C) PROF. FEES 5,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,103,617

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - ELECTION EXPENSES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the State Board of Election Commissioners, to be payable
from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for covering the costs of
election expenses of the State Board of Election Commissioners for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of...........................$6,340,000.
01/06/2025 1:55:30 PM CJW001

HB1099

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - NONPARTISAN GENERAL ELECTION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the State Board of Election Commissioners, to be
payable from the Nonpartisan Filing Fee Fund, for covering the costs of
election expenses of the State Board of Election Commissioners for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of...........................$1,600,000.

SECTION 6. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
CARRY FORWARD – ELECTION EXPENSES. At the close of the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2025 2026, any unexpended balance of monies provided for Election
Expenses, shall be transferred forward and made available for the same
purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026 2027.
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized herein, may
be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement set
forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward, the program name
or line item, the funding source of that appropriation and a copy of the
written request set forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include
all information obtained in item (3) above in the biennial budget manuals
and/or a statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or
01/06/2025 1:55:30 PM CJW001

HB1099
Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 7. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER. If funds are not available for the State Board of Election
Commissioners to perform their duties, the Director of the State Board of
Election Commissioners may from time to time certify to the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State the amount of funds needed and the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State shall transfer the certified amount from the Nonpartisan Filing
Fee Fund to the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund for use by the State Board of
Election Commissioners.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 8. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 9. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 10. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
01/06/2025 1:55:30 PM CJW001

HB1099
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.


























01/06/2025 1:55:30 PM CJW001